Ohio, session 136, HB916.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 3701.27 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3701.27. (A) Not later than July 1, 2027, the department of health shall establish and administer the children's dental services program. Under the program, dental care services, including screenings, treatment, and preventive care, may be provided to a child who meets the following conditions: (1) The child resides in an underserved area as determined by the department. (2) The child meets any other eligibility condition established by the department. (B) The dental care services described in division (A) of this section may be provided by deploying mobile dental units to schools and underserved areas. (C) In administering the program, the department shall focus on increasing children's access to dental care and helping to reduce the incidence of dental caries among children. (D) In enacting this section, it is the intent of the general assembly to appropriate sufficient funding to the department in order to support its administration of the program. Section 2. All items in this act are hereby appropriated as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. Section 3. 1 2 3 4 5 A DOH DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH B General Revenue Fund C GRF 440497 Children's Dental Services $0 $3,000,000 D General Revenue Fund Total $0 $3,000,000 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $0 $3,000,000 CHILDREN'S DENTAL SERVICES The foregoing appropriation item 440497, Children's Dental Services, shall be used to support the provision of dental care services as described in section 3701.27 of the Revised Code. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of appropriation item 440497, Children's Dental Services, at the end of fiscal year 2027 is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for the same purpose in fiscal year 2028. Section 4. Within the limits set forth in this act, the Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from operating appropriations contained in this act shall be accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all applicable provisions of, H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly.